District of Columbia statutes.
2-273.08

Compliance with federal and District law.

(a)

Parties to a public-private partnership agreement shall be exempt from Chapter 3A of this title [§ 2-351.01 et seq.], provided that §§ 2-352.02 and 2-354.15 and subchapters VII and X of Chapter 3A of this title shall apply.

(b)

Private entities shall comply, to the extent applicable, with:

(1)

Subchapter X of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-219.01 et seq.];

(2)

Subchapter X-A of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-220.01 et seq.], or the rate established by the use of a project labor agreement, notice of which must be provided by the Office before soliciting bids or proposals for a public-private partnership;

(3)

Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-218.01 et seq.];

(4)

Subchapter II of Chapter 28 of Title 47 [§ 47-2861 et seq.];

(5)

Chapter 14A of Title 6 [§ 6-1451.01 et seq.];

(6)

Subchapter XII of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-1226.31 et seq.];

(7)

The Davis-Bacon Act of 1931, approved March 3, 1931 (46 Stat. 1494; 40 U.S.C. § 3141 et seq.); and

(8)

Chapter 8A of Title 32 [§ 32-851 et seq.].

(c)

Unless otherwise provided by law, nothing in this chapter shall exempt public-private partnership projects and participating public and private entities from complying with all applicable District laws and regulations.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 113, 62 DCR 261